Maryland, session 2026, SB0700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
32–102
This title applies only in Wicomico County.
32–1003.
(a) There is a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (golf course) license.
(b) The Board of License Commissioners may issue the license for the use of a golf
course or organization that:
(1) is open to the public;
(2) is operated for profit;
(3) owns real estate in the county; and
– 1 –

Ch. 821 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) has a golf course with a minimum of 18 holes.
(c) (1) The license holder may sell beer, wine, and liquor for consumption on
the land and in the buildings, including the clubhouse, used for golfing purposes.
(2) A patron need not be seated to be served.
(d) A holder of the license may sell beer, wine, and liquor:
(1) on Monday through Saturday, from [10 a.m.] 7 A.M. to 2 a.m. the
following day; and
(2) on Sunday, from [10 a.m.] 7 A.M. to midnight.
(e) The annual license fee is $2,200.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –